Wyoming, session 2025, HB0113.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-15-105(a)(ix)(A), (B) and by
creating a new subparagraph (C) and 39-16-105(a)(x)(A), (B)
and by creating a new subparagraph (C) are amended to read:

39-15-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following sales or leases are exempt from the
excise tax imposed by this article:

HB0113

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0392
(ix) For the purpose of avoiding application of
the sales tax more than once on the same article of
tangible property for the same taxpayer:

(A) The trade-in value of tangible personal
property shall be excluded from the sales price of new
tangible personal property when trade-in and purchase occur
in one (1) transaction; and

(B) The sales price paid for a motor
vehicle, house trailer, trailer coach, trailer or
semitrailer as defined in W.S. 31-1-101 if the vehicle is
purchased by a nonresident of Wyoming and the vehicle is to
be removed from the state of Wyoming within thirty (30)
days of purchase. The purchaser shall declare under
penalty of perjury on a form prescribed by the department
that he is not a resident of Wyoming;. and

(C) The amount of any insurance payment
used to purchase motor vehicles, house trailers, trailer
coaches, trailers or semitrailers shall be excluded from
the sale price of those items to the extent the owner's
previous motor vehicle, house trailer, trailer coach,
HB0113

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0392
trailer or semitrailer was acquired by an insurance company
pursuant to a damage settlement and the insurance payment
is used not more than ninety (90) days after receiving the
insurance payment to purchase another motor vehicle, house
trailer, trailer coach, trailer or semitrailer for which
sales tax is due.

39-16-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following purchases or leases are exempt from
the excise tax imposed by this article:

(x) For the purpose of avoiding application of
the use tax more than once on the same article of tangible
property for the same taxpayer:

(A) The trade-in value of tangible personal
property shall be excluded from the sales price of new
tangible personal property when trade-in and purchase occur
in one (1) transaction; and

(B) The purchase price paid for a motor
vehicle, house trailer, trailer coach, trailer or
HB0113

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0392
semitrailer as defined in W.S. 31-1-101 if the vehicle is
purchased by a nonresident of Wyoming and the vehicle is to
be removed from the state of Wyoming within thirty (30)
days of purchase. The purchaser shall declare under
penalty of perjury on a form prescribed by the department
that he is not a resident of Wyoming;. and

(C) The amount of any insurance payment
used to purchase motor vehicles, house trailers, trailer
coaches, trailers or semitrailers shall be excluded from
the sale price of those items to the extent the owner's
previous motor vehicle, house trailer, trailer coach,
trailer or semitrailer was acquired by an insurance company
pursuant to a damage settlement and the insurance payment
is used not more than ninety (90) days after receiving the
insurance payment to purchase another motor vehicle, house
trailer, trailer coach, trailer or semitrailer for which
use tax is due.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0113